Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,105
Cannabis and cannabis accessories; use, possession, and acquisition; not an offense under state or local law; not subject to Uniform Controlled Substances Act; when.

(1) Subject to the requirements of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act, it shall not be an offense under state or local law for:

(a) A qualified patient to use, possess, and acquire an allowable amount of cannabis and cannabis accessories for the alleviation of a medical condition, its symptoms, or side effects of the condition's treatment; or

(b) A caregiver to assist a qualified patient with the activities set forth in subdivision (1)(a) of this section by possessing and acquiring an allowable amount of cannabis and cannabis accessories on behalf of the qualified patient and delivering an allowable amount of cannabis and cannabis accessories to the qualified patient.

(2) Conduct protected by this section shall not be subject to the Uniform Controlled Substances Act.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 437, § 3.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.